Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2914
District; territory withdrawn; obligations; when not liable.

An area withdrawn from a district shall not be subject to assessment or otherwise chargeable for any obligation of any nature or kind incurred after the withdrawal of the area.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 14.